Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5049.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-48.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-48.2. Plates for recipients of the Bronze Star Medal.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available to
recipients of the United States Bronze Star Medal a special motor vehicle registration plate for any
motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile or commercial vehicle having a gross
weight of twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.) or less, indicating the owner as a recipient of the
Bronze Star Medal. The applicant shall be required to pay a registration fee and a transfer charge
of five dollars ($5.00) for the plate.
(b) The plate shall contain the words “Bronze Star Medal” across the top of the plate, shall
bear an insignia for the Bronze Star Medal, and then a numeral or numerals.
(c) Upon the death of the holder of any “Bronze Star Medal” plate, the plate shall be
transferred to the surviving spouse for the spouse’s lifetime or until remarriage.
(d) The applicant shall not be required to pay a registration fee or service charge for the
plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000051/SUB A
========